North Carolina statutes. Chapter 63. Aeronautics.
Article 2. State Regulation.

§ 63-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 936, s. 1.

§ 63-11.
Sovereignty in space.

Sovereignty in space above the lands and waters of this State is declared to rest in the State, except where granted to and assumed by the United States.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 2.

§ 63-12.
Ownership of space.

The ownership of the space above the lands and waters of this State is declared to be vested in the several owners of the surface beneath, subject to the right of flight described in

G.S. 63-13

.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 3.

§ 63-13.
Lawfulness of flight.

Flight in aircraft over the lands and waters of this State is lawful, unless at such a low altitude as to interfere with the then existing use to which the land or water, or the space over the land or water, is put by the owner, or unless so conducted as to be injurious to the health and happiness, or imminently dangerous to persons or property lawfully on the land or water beneath. The landing of an aircraft on the lands or waters of another, without his consent, is unlawful, except in the case of a forced landing. For damages caused by a forced landing, however, the owner or lessee of the aircraft or the aeronaut shall be liable as provided in

G.S. 63-14

.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 4; 1947, c. 1001, s. 1.

§ 63-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1947, c. 1069, s. 3.

§ 63-15.
Collision of aircraft.

The liability of the owners of one aircraft to the owner of another aircraft, or to aeronauts or passengers on either aircraft, for damages caused by collision on land or in the air shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 6.

§ 63-16.
Jurisdiction over crimes and torts.

All crimes, torts, and other wrongs committed by or against an airman or passenger while in flight over this State shall be governed by the laws of this State; and the question whether damage occasioned by or to an aircraft while in flight over this State constitutes a tort, crime or other wrong by or against the owner of such aircraft shall be determined by the laws of this State.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 7; 1971, c. 936, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to jurisdiction, see also

G.S. 63-24

.

§ 63-17.
Jurisdiction over contracts.

All contractual and other legal relations entered into by airmen or passengers while in flight over this State shall have the same effect as if entered into on the land or water beneath.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 8; 1971, c. 936, s. 3.

§ 63-18.
Dangerous flying a misdemeanor.

Any airman or passenger who, while in flight over a thickly inhabited area or over a public gathering within this State, shall engage in trick or acrobatic flying, or in any acrobatic feat, or shall except while in landing or taking off, fly at such a low level as to disturb the public peace or the rights of private persons in the enjoyment of their homes, or injure the health, or endanger the persons or property on the surface beneath, or drop any object except loose water or loose sand ballast, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 9; 1947, c. 1001, s. 2; 1971, c. 936, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 493; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The prohibition against “flying at such a low level as to disturb the public peace or the rights of private persons in the enjoyment of their homes” contained in the statute should be read as a prohibition against flying contrary to that mandated by federal law. See opinion of Attorney General to Raymond D. Large, Jr., Hunter, Large & Sherrill, P.L.L.C., 2002 N.C. AG LEXIS 23 (7/10/02).

§ 63-19.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 543.

§ 63-20.
Qualifications of operator; federal license.

The public safety requiring, and the advantages of uniform regulation making it desirable, in the interest of aeronautical progress, that a person engaging within this State in operating aircraft, in any form of aerial navigation for which a license to operate aircraft issued by the United States government would then be required if such aerial navigation were interstate, should have the qualifications necessary for obtaining and holding such a license, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in operating aircraft within the State, in any such form of aerial navigation, unless he have such federal license.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 11.

§ 63-21.
Possession and exhibition of license certificate.

The certificate of the license, herein required, shall be kept in the personal possession of the licensee when he is operating aircraft within this State and must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any peace officer of this State, or any official, manager or person in charge of any airport or landing field in this State upon which he shall land.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 12.

§ 63-22.
Aircraft; construction, design and airworthiness; federal registration.

The public safety requiring, and the advantages of uniform regulation making it desirable, in the interest of aeronautical progress, that aircraft to be operated within this State should conform, with respect to design, construction and airworthiness, to standards then prescribed by the United States government with respect to aerial navigation of aircraft subject to its jurisdiction, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate an aircraft within this State unless it is registered pursuant to the lawful rules and regulations of the United States government then in force, if the circumstances of such aerial navigation are of a character that such registration would be required in the case of interstate aerial navigation.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 13.

§ 63-23.
Penalties.

A person who violates any provision of

G.S. 63-20

, 63-21 or 63-22 of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor; provided, however, that acts or omissions made unlawful by

G.S. 63-20

, 63-21 or 63-22 of this Article shall not be deemed to include any act or omission which violates the laws or lawful regulations of the United States.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 494; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 63-24.
Jurisdiction of State over crimes and torts retained.

Provided that this Article shall not be construed as a waiver of jurisdiction of the courts of the State of North Carolina over any crime or tort committed within the State of North Carolina, and provided, further, that the General Assembly of North Carolina may at any time amend, regulate or control any of the powers which may be assumed by the United States Department of Commerce under this Article.

History.

1929, c. 190, s. 15.